California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(v) A detailed description of expenditures or investments, as applicable.

(J) The commission shall establish yearly benchmarks for TNCs and access providers to meet to ensure WAV users receive continuously improved, reliable, and available service. These benchmarks shall include, but are not limited to, response times, percentage of trips fulfilled versus trips requested, and number of users requesting rides versus community WAV demand for each geographic area.

(K) The commission shall authorize no more than 2 percent of existing funds collected from TNCs pursuant to Section 421 and deposited into the Public Utilities Commission Transportation Reimbursement Account to be distributed to accessibility advocates who
 provide a substantial contribution to the proceeding initiated pursuant to this section, and only for the duration of the commission proceeding initiated pursuant to this section. These funds shall only be distributed to advocates for accessible transportation or representatives of a group whose membership uses accessible transportation. The commission shall distribute funds pursuant to this subparagraph in a manner consistent with the requirements of Sections 1803 to 1808, inclusive. The commission shall not increase the fees authorized pursuant to Section 421 in order to fulfill the requirements of this subparagraph. Nothing in this subparagraph is intended to allow parties to obtain intervenor compensation for other transportation proceedings at the commission.

(2) (A) Report to the Legislature by January 1,
 2024, on compliance with this section and on the effectiveness of the on-demand transportation programs or partnerships funded pursuant to this section. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(i) A study on the demand for WAVs, including demand according to time of day and geographic area.

(ii) An analysis of the reports required to be submitted by access providers receiving funding pursuant to paragraph (1).

(iii) The availability of unallocated funds in the Access Fund, including the need to reassess Access Fund allocations.

(iv) An analysis of current program capabilities and deficiencies, and recommendations to overcome any
 identified deficiencies.

(B) The report required by this paragraph shall be submitted to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(3) Create a working group with stakeholders described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) to examine the variety of agencies, localities, and programs that provide transportation services for persons with disabilities, including passenger stage carriers and charter-party carriers within the commission’s jurisdiction, in order to evaluate ways to partner with those agencies to provide services to disabled persons in a nonduplicative, nondiscriminatory, and more efficient manner.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys deposited in
 the TNC Access for All Fund created pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) are continuously appropriated to the commission without regard to fiscal years for purposes of the program established pursuant to this section.

(c) The commission may hire an independent entity to administer the program established pursuant to subdivision (a) and to complete the report required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) This section does not limit the rights of any person to pursue any remedies or causes of action that they may have under any state or federal law to enforce compliance with those laws or the obligations stated in this section. This section does not expand or limit any obligations, if any, of a transportation network company
 under existing state or federal disability access laws.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 205, Sec. 2.   (AB 1532)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5441.

The Legislature does not intend, and nothing in this article shall be construed, to prohibit the commission from exercising its rulemaking authority in a manner consistent with this article, or to prohibit enforcement activities related to transportation network companies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (AB 2293)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5442.

A participating driver of a transportation network company shall carry proof of transportation network company insurance coverage with him or her at all times during his or her use of a vehicle in connection with a transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform. In the event of an accident, a participating driver shall provide this insurance coverage information to any other party involved in the accident, and to a police officer, upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (AB 2293)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5443.

Notwithstanding Section 11580.9 of the Insurance Code, or any other law affecting whether one or more policies of insurance that may apply with respect to an occurrence is primary or excess, this article determines the obligations under insurance policies issued to transportation network companies and, if applicable, drivers using a vehicle in connection with a transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.   (AB 2293)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5444.

Notwithstanding any limitations contained in Section 1808.1 of the Vehicle Code, a transportation network company is eligible to participate and shall participate in the pull-notice system established pursuant to Section 1808.1 of the Vehicle Code to regularly check the driving records of a participating driver regardless of whether the participating driver is an employee or an independent contractor of the transportation network company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 791, Sec. 1.   (AB 1422)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5445.1.

A transportation network company shall provide all of the following information to a passenger on its online-enabled application or platform at the time the passenger is matched with a transportation network company driver:

(a) The transportation network company driver’s first name and a picture of the driver.

(b) An image of the make and model of the transportation network company driver’s vehicle.

(c) The license plate number of the transportation network company driver’s vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (AB 2986)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5445.2.

(a) (1) A transportation network company shall conduct, or have a third party conduct, a local and national criminal background check for each participating driver that shall include both of the following:

(A) The use of a multistate and multijurisdiction criminal records locator or other similar commercial nationwide database with validation.

(B) A search of the United States Department of Justice National Sex Offender Public website.

(2) A transportation network company shall not contract with, employ, or retain a driver if the driver meets
 either of the following criteria:

(A) Is currently registered on the United States Department of Justice National Sex Offender Public website.

(B) Has been convicted of any of the following offenses:

(i) A violent felony, as defined in Section 667.5 of the Penal Code.

(ii) A violation of Section 236.1, 11413, 11418, 11418.5, or 11419 of the Penal Code.

(3) A transportation network company shall not contract with, employ, or retain a driver if the driver has been convicted of any of the following
 offenses within the previous seven years:

(A) Misdemeanor assault or battery.

(B) A domestic violence offense.

(C) Driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs.

(D) A felony violation of Section 18540 of the Elections Code, or of Section 67, 68, 85, 86, 92, 93, 137, 138, 165, 518, or 530 of, subdivision (a) of Section 484 of, or subdivision (a) of Section 487 of, the Penal Code.

(4) Paragraphs (2) and (3) apply with respect to a conviction of any offense committed in another jurisdiction that includes all of the elements of any of the offenses described or defined in those paragraphs.

(5) This section shall not be interpreted to prevent a transportation network company from imposing additional standards.

(b) A transportation network company that violates, or fails to comply with, this section is subject to a penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each offense.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Section 1786.12 of the Civil Code, an investigative consumer reporting agency may furnish an investigative consumer report to a transportation network company about a person seeking to become a participating driver, regardless of whether the participating driver is to be an employee or an independent contractor of the transportation
 network company.

(2) Paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 1786.18 of the Civil Code does not apply to an investigative consumer report furnished to a transportation network company pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.   (AB 880)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5445.3.

(a) A participating driver is required to possess either of the following:

(1) A valid driver’s license issued by the State of California.

(2) (A) In the case of a nonresident active duty military member or a nonresident dependent of an active duty military member, a valid driver’s license issued by the other state or territory of the United States in which the member or dependent is a resident.

(B) A transportation network company shall comply with the provisions of Section 5445.2 and obtain and review the driving history report from the state or territory of the United States that issued the individual’s driver’s
 license before permitting a nonresident active duty military member or a nonresident dependent of an active duty military member to act as a participating driver and shall ensure that the driver satisfies all requirements applicable to participating drivers, including, but not limited to, the regulations of the commission and the applicable requirements of the Vehicle Code.

(b) A transportation network company shall notify all participating drivers of the applicability of the Vehicle Code and of the code’s availability, including, in particular, Sections 23123 and 23123.5 (relating to the hands-free device laws), Section 21760 (the “Three Feet for Safety Act”), and Section 22454 (relating to rules of the road relating to schoolbuses), to all participating drivers, either on the transportation network company’s internet website or on its application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 247.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5446.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City and County of San Francisco may impose a tax on each ride originating in the City and County of San Francisco provided by a participating driver in an amount not to exceed the following:

(1) One and one-half percent of net rider fares for a shared ride in which, prior to commencement of the ride, a passenger requests through the transportation network company’s online-enabled application or platform to share the ride with one or more passengers and each passenger is charged a fare that is calculated, in whole or in part, based on the passenger’s request to share all or part of the ride with one or more passengers, regardless of whether the passenger actually shares all or part of the ride.

(2) Three and one-quarter percent of the net rider fare for a ride other than a ride described in paragraph (1).

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the City and County of San Francisco may impose a tax on each ride originating in the City and County of San Francisco provided by an autonomous vehicle, whether facilitated by a transportation network company or any other person, in an amount not to exceed the following:

(1) One and one-half percent of net rider fares for a shared ride in which, prior to commencement of the ride, a passenger requests to share the ride with one or more passengers and each passenger is charged a fare that is calculated, in whole or in part, based on the passenger’s request to share all or part of the ride with one or more passengers, regardless of whether the passenger actually shares all or
 part of the ride.

(2) Three and one-quarter percent of the net rider fare for a ride other than a ride described in paragraph (1).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the City and County of San Francisco may set a lower tax rate for net rider fares for a ride originating in the City and County of San Francisco provided by a zero-emission vehicle to further incentivize deployment of zero-emission vehicles. 

(d) For purposes of this section, “net rider fare” means all charges for a ride, including, but not limited to, charges based on time or distance, or both, and excluding any additional charges such as taxes, airport or venue fees, or fees imposed by the commission.

(e) Moneys collected by the City and County of San
 Francisco pursuant to this section shall be dedicated to fund transportation operations and infrastructure within the City and County of San Francisco.

(f) A tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be subject to applicable voter approval requirements imposed by law. 

(g) A tax imposed pursuant to this section shall expire no later than November 5, 2045.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 644, Sec. 2.   (AB 1184)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5450.

(a) (1) The program established pursuant to this section shall be known as the California Clean Miles Standard and Incentive Program.

(2) For purposes of this section, “board” means the State Air Resources Board.

(3) This section applies to transportation providers regulated by the commission that provide prearranged transportation services for compensation using an online-enabled application or platform to connect passengers, including autonomous vehicles, charter-party carriers, and new modes of ridesharing technology that may arise through innovation and subsequent regulation.

(b) (1) By January 1, 2020, the board shall establish a baseline for emissions of greenhouse gases for vehicles used on the online-enabled applications or platforms by transportation network companies on a per-passenger-mile basis. For purposes of this section, emissions per-passenger-mile traveled means the estimated emissions from all vehicles miles traveled in periods 1, 2, and 3, as those terms are used by the commission, including miles driven with no passenger in the vehicles, divided by the total number of passenger miles resulting from transport by those vehicles in period 3, including facilitation of walking, biking, and other modes of active or zero-emission transportation. The board shall use 2018 as the baseline year.

(2) By January 1, 2021, the board shall adopt, and the commission shall implement, annual targets and goals, beginning in 2023, for the reduction under the baseline established
 pursuant to paragraph (1) of emissions of greenhouse gases per passenger-mile driven on behalf of a transportation network company. These targets and goals shall include annual goals for increasing passenger-miles traveled using zero-emission vehicles. These targets and goals shall be consistent with the Zero-Emission Vehicle Action Plan, be consistent with the stated goals detailed in Executive Order B-48-18, be technically and economically feasible, and be based upon data reported by the transportation network companies to the commission.

(3) The data required of transportation network companies to determine average emissions of greenhouse gases per passenger-mile to be calculated by the board and commission shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The total miles completed by drivers.

(B) The percent share of miles completed by qualified zero-emission means, including miles completed by vehicle, walking, biking, other modes of active transportation, and zero-emission vehicles.

(C) Miles-weighted average network-wide grams of carbon dioxide per mile to produce an estimate of the emissions of greenhouse gases.

(D) Total passenger-miles completed using an average passengers-per-trip estimate to account for trips where exact passenger head count data was not captured.

(4) The board shall delay adoption, and the commission shall delay implementation, of the targets and goals pursuant to paragraph (2) if the board or commission finds that unanticipated barriers exist to expanding the usage of zero-emission vehicles by transportation network companies. The board and commission shall review
 the available data related to barriers to expanding the usage of zero-emission vehicles by transportation network companies no less often than every two years, including data relative to current and future electric transportation adoption rates and charging infrastructure utilization rates.

(c) By January 1, 2022, and every two years thereafter, each transportation network company shall develop a greenhouse gas emissions reduction plan. A transportation network company greenhouse gas emissions reduction plan shall include proposals on how to meet the targets and goals for reducing emissions of greenhouse gases established pursuant to subdivision (b) based upon the following:

(1) Increased proportion of participating drivers with zero-emission vehicles using transportation network companies.

(2) Increased proportion
 of vehicle-miles completed by zero-emission vehicles relative to all vehicle-miles.

(3) Decreased gram-per-mile greenhouse gas emissions rates.

(4) Increased passenger-miles in proportion to overall vehicle-miles.

(d) In implementing this section, the commission, the board, and the Energy Commission shall ensure that ongoing state planning efforts and funding programs that are intended to accelerate the adoption of zero-emission vehicles and charging infrastructure shall consider the goals of the California Clean Miles Standard and Incentive Program. The commission shall additionally do all the following:

(1) Ensure minimal negative impact on low-income and moderate-income drivers.

(2) Ensure that the program complements and supports the sustainable land-use objectives contained in Section 65080 of the Government Code.

(3) Support the goals of clean mobility for low- and moderate-income individuals.

(4) Advance the goals of the California Clean Miles Standard and Incentive Program in reviewing utility transportation electrification applications filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 740.12 and encourage collaboration between electric vehicle charging companies, investor-owned utilities, fleet owners that provide vehicles by contract to participating drivers for use on transportation network company platforms, entities contracting with participating drivers to provide zero-emission vehicles for use on transportation network company platforms, and transportation network companies on investments that would support the California Clean Miles
 Standard and Incentive Program, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 740.12 and Executive Order B-48-18.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 369, Sec. 4.   (SB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Commercial Air Carriers [5500. - 5513.]



  ARTICLE 1. Accident Liability Protection [5500. - 5513.]

5500.

As used in this article, “commercial air operator” means any person owning, controlling, operating, renting, or managing aircraft for any commercial purpose for compensation. “Commercial air operator” does not include any person owning, controlling, operating, renting, managing, furnishing, or otherwise providing transportation by hot air balloon for entertainment, sporting, or recreational purposes.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 706, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 108, Sec. 1.   (AB 1524)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5501.

As used in this article, “aircraft” means any contrivance used for navigation of, or flight in, the air. “Aircraft” does not include a hot air balloon furnished or providing transportation for entertainment, sporting, or recreational purposes.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 706, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 108, Sec. 3.   (AB 1524)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5502.

As used in this article, “person” means any individual, firm, partnership, private, municipal or public corporation, limited liability company, company, association, joint stock association, trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 219.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5503.

(a) All commercial air operators shall maintain in force at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) of liability insurance for personal injury, wrongful death, and property damage resulting from the operation of an aircraft pursuant to this article, with additional liability coverage of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each passenger for any aircraft covered by this article.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 24) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 25.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5504.

This article does not apply to any person licensed under Article 1 (commencing with Section 11701) of Chapter 4 of Division 6 of the Food and Agricultural Code with respect to that person’s operation of an aircraft for the purpose of applying pest control materials or substances by dusting, spraying, or any other manner whereby the materials or substances are applied through the medium of aircraft. That person is subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11931) of Chapter 5 of Division 6 of the Food and Agricultural Code with respect to that aircraft operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 137.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.

(a) All commercial air operators shall comply with any requirement of a city, county, or city and county that the person obtain a business license as a condition for operating in that city, county, or city and county.

(b) All commercial air operators shall also provide the city, county, or city and county a currently effective certificate of insurance evidencing insurance coverage as required in Section 5503. A new certificate of insurance shall be provided to the city, county, or city and county at least annually or whenever there is a material change in insurance coverage. A city, county, or city and county shall give reasonable notice of this requirement with any
 business license renewal notification. A city, county, or city and county may charge a reasonable fee for purposes of carrying out the provisions of this subdivision.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 28) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 29.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5508.

(a) The protection against liability shall be continued in effect so long as the commercial air operator continues to offer his or her services for compensation. The policy of insurance or surety bond shall not be cancelable on less than 30 days’ written notice to the city, county, or city and county, except in the event of cessation of operations as a commercial air operator. 

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 31) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 32.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5510.

Any commercial air operator who knowingly refuses or fails to procure protection against liability, as required by Section 5503, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 581, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5511.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5506, a city, county, or city and county shall have the authority to accept policies of insurance written by nonadmitted insurers subject to Section 1763 of the Insurance Code of this state, provided that the policies of insurance shall meet the rules and regulations adopted therefor by the applicable jurisdiction. 

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 34) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 35.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5512.

(a) Following an administrative hearing, a city, county, or city and county may impose a penalty of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon any commercial air operator who fails to file the evidence of liability protection required by this article. 

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 36) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 37.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5513.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, any person owning, controlling, operating, renting, managing, furnishing, or otherwise providing transportation by hot air balloon for hire shall maintain in force at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) of liability insurance for personal injury, wrongful death, and property damage resulting from the operation of a balloon carrying up to 10 passengers, with additional liability coverage of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each passenger for any balloon carrying more than 10 passengers. A notice shall be provided to every passenger that identifies both the insurer providing a policy of liability insurance to the person providing that transportation and the amount of insurance coverage provided by that policy.

(b) Any person owning, controlling, operating, renting, managing, furnishing, or otherwise providing transportation by hot air balloon for hire shall comply with any requirement of a city, county, or city and county that the person obtain a business license as a condition for operating in that city, county, or city and county. Whenever a city, county, or city and county requires a business license, any person owning, controlling, operating, renting, managing, furnishing, or otherwise providing transportation by hot air balloon for hire shall prominently display the license only within the city or county of the person’s primary place of business frequented by customers and potential customers. Whenever a city, county, or city and county requires a business license, the person shall provide to the city, county, or city and county, a currently effective certificate of insurance evidencing insurance coverage as required in subdivision (a). A new
 certificate of insurance shall be provided to the city, county, or city and county, at least annually or whenever there is a material change in insurance coverage. A city, county, or city and county shall give reasonable notice of this requirement with any business license renewal notification. Every business license issued by a city, county, or city and county to any person owning, controlling, operating, renting, managing, furnishing, or otherwise providing transportation by hot air balloon for hire and every currently effective certificate of insurance evidencing insurance coverage, shall be maintained as a public record. The city, county, or city and county may charge a reasonable fee for purposes of carrying out the provisions of this subdivision.

(c) Any person who violates subdivision (a) by failing to maintain insurance in force as required by subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person who violates subdivision (b) by failing
 to obtain and maintain a current valid city, county, or city and county business license issued by the local government jurisdiction where the person’s primary place of business is located, in accordance with subdivision (b), is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 108, Sec. 5.   (AB 1524)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2.5. THE DIGITAL INFRASTRUCTURE AND VIDEO COMPETITION ACT OF 2006 [5800. - 5970.]

5800.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the Digital Infrastructure and Video Competition Act of 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5810.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Increasing competition for video and broadband services is a matter of statewide concern for all of the following reasons:

(A) Video and cable services provide numerous benefits to all Californians including access to a variety of news, public information, education, and entertainment programming.

(B) Increased competition in the cable and video service sector provides consumers with more choice, lowers prices, speeds the deployment of new communication and broadband technologies, creates jobs, and benefits the California economy.

(C) To promote competition, the state should establish a state-issued franchise authorization process that allows market participants to use their networks and systems to provide video, voice, and broadband services to all residents of the state.

(D) Competition for video service should increase opportunities for programming that appeals to California’s diverse population and many cultural communities.

(2) Legislation to develop this new process should adhere to the following principles:

(A) Create a fair and level playing field for all market competitors that does not disadvantage or advantage one service provider or technology over another.

(B) Promote the widespread access to the most technologically advanced cable and video services to all California communities in a nondiscriminatory manner regardless of socioeconomic status.

(C) Protect local government revenues and control of public rights-of-way.

(D) Require market participants to comply with all applicable consumer protection laws.

(E) Complement efforts to increase investment in broadband infrastructure and close the digital divide.

(F) Continue access to and maintenance of the public, education, and government (PEG) channels.

(G) Maintain all existing authority of the California Public Utilities Commission as established in state and federal statutes.

(3) The public interest is best served when sufficient funds are appropriated to the commission to provide adequate staff and resources to appropriately and timely process applications of video service providers and to ensure full compliance with the requirements of this division. It is the intent of the Legislature that, although video service providers are not public utilities or common carriers, the commission shall collect any fees authorized by this division in the same manner and under the same terms as it collects fees from common carriers, electrical corporations, gas corporations, telephone corporations, telegraph corporations, water corporations, and every other public utility providing service directly to customers or subscribers subject to its jurisdiction such that it does not discriminate against video service providers or their subscribers.

(4) Providing an incumbent cable operator the option to secure a state-issued franchise through the preemption of an existing cable franchise between a cable operator and any political subdivision of the state, including, but not limited to, a charter city, county, or city and county, is an essential element of the new regulatory framework established by this act as a matter of statewide concern to best ensure equal protection and parity among providers and technologies, as well as to achieve the goals stated by the Legislature in enacting this act.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that a video service provider shall pay as rent a franchise fee to the local entity in whose jurisdiction service is being provided for the continued use of streets, public facilities, and other rights-of-way of the local entity in order to provide service. The Legislature recognizes that local entities should be compensated for the use of the public rights-of-way and that the franchise fee is intended to compensate them in the form of rent or a toll, similar to that which the court found to be appropriate in Santa Barbara County Taxpayers Association v. Board of Supervisors for the County of Santa Barbara (1989) 209 Cal. App. 3d 940.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that collective bargaining agreements be respected.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the definition of gross revenues in this division shall result in local entities maintaining their existing level of revenue from franchise fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 123, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5820.

(a) Nothing in this division shall be deemed as creating a vested right in a state-issued franchise by the franchise holder or its affiliates that would preclude the state from amending the provisions that establish the terms and conditions of a franchise.

(b) Nothing in this division shall be construed to eliminate or reduce a telephone corporation’s or video service provider’s obligations under any applicable state or federal environmental protection laws. The local entity shall serve as the lead agency for any environmental review under this division and may impose conditions to mitigate environmental impacts of the applicant’s use of the public rights-of-way that may be required pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(c) The holder of a state franchise shall not be deemed a public utility as a result of providing video service under this division. This division shall not be construed as granting authority to the commission to regulate the rates, terms, and conditions of video services, except as explicitly set forth in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5830.

For purposes of this division, the following words have the following meanings:

(a) “Broadband” means any service defined as broadband in the most recent Federal Communications Commission inquiry pursuant to Section 706 of the Telecommunications Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-104).

(b) “Cable operator” means any person or group of persons that either provides cable service over a cable system and directly, or through one or more affiliates, owns a significant interest in a cable system; or that otherwise controls or is responsible for, through any arrangement, the management and operation of a cable system, as set forth in Section 522(5) of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(c) “Cable service” is defined as the one-way transmission to subscribers of either video programming, or other programming service, and subscriber interaction, if any, that is required for the selection or use of video programming or other programming service, as set forth in Section 522(6) of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(d) “Cable system” is defined as set forth in Section 522(7) of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(e) “Commission” means the Public Utilities Commission.

(f) “Franchise” means an initial authorization, or renewal of an authorization, issued by a franchising entity, regardless of whether the authorization is designated as a franchise, permit, license, resolution, contract, certificate, agreement, or otherwise, that authorizes the construction and operation of any network in the right-of-way capable of providing video service to subscribers.

(g) “Franchise fee” means the fee adopted pursuant to Section 5840.

(h) “Holder” or “holder of a state franchise” means a person or group of persons that has been issued a state franchise from the commission pursuant to this division.

(i) “Incumbent cable operator” means a cable operator or OVS serving subscribers under a franchise in a particular city, county, or city and county franchise area on January 1, 2007.

(j) “Local entity” means any city, county, city and county, or joint powers authority within the state within whose jurisdiction a holder of a state franchise under this division may provide cable service or video service.

(k) “Local franchising entity” means the city, county, city and county, or joint powers authority entitled to require franchises and impose fees on cable operators, as set forth in Section 53066 of the Government Code.

(l) “Network” means a component of a facility that is wholly or partly physically located within a public right-of-way and that is used to provide video service, cable service, voice, or data services.

(m) “Open-video system” or “OVS” means those services set forth in Section 573 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(n) “OVS operator” means any person or group of persons that either provides cable service over an open-video system directly, or through one or more affiliates, owns a significant interest in an open-video system, or that otherwise controls or is responsible for, through any arrangement, the management of an open-video system.

(o) “Public rights-of-way” means the area along and upon any public road or highway, or along or across any of the waters or lands within the state.

(p) “State franchise” means a franchise that is issued pursuant to this division.

(q) “Subscriber” means a person who lawfully receives video service from the holder of a state franchise for a fee.

(r) “Video programming” means programming provided by, or generally considered comparable to programming provided by, a television broadcast station, as set forth in Section 522(20) of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(s) “Video service” means video programming services, cable service, or OVS service provided through facilities located at least in part in public rights-of-way without regard to delivery technology, including Internet protocol or other technology. This definition does not include (1) any video programming provided by a commercial mobile service provider defined in Section 332(d) of Title 47 of the United States Code, or (2) video programming provided as part of, and via, a service that enables users to access content, information, electronic mail, or other services offered over the public Internet.

(t) “Video service provider” means an entity providing video service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 123, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5840.
